trunk/apertium-oldca-XX/apertium-oldca-XX.oldca.dix
    <pardef n="CM_V1C">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ant</l>
          <r><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ant</l>
          <r><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="partpi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl_femT"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pi1"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>av</l>
          <r><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_ii1"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>àv</l>
          <r><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="FutInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_fut"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pp1"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>àr</l>
          <r><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>à</l>
          <r><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_ps_or"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_impsbj_és"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_impsbj_es"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="CondInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_cond"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eu</l>
          <r><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_vocal"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_vocal"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eu</l>
          <r><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abras</l>
          <r>abrasar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>acapar</l>
          <r>acaparar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>encert</l>
          <r>encertar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>acord</l>
          <r>acordar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>acumul</l>
          <r>acumular<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>administr</l>
          <r>administrar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afront</l>
          <r>afrontar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aguant</l>
          <r>aguantar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allist</l>
          <r>allistar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>empar</l>
          <r>emparar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anticip</l>
          <r>anticipar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apil</l>
          <r>apilar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>apunt</l>
          <r>apuntar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arrend</l>
          <r>arrendar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asfalt</l>
          <r>asfaltar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>turment</l>
          <r>turmentar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dejun</l>
          <r>dejunar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bany</l>
          <r>banyar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>brind</l>
          <r>brindar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>camin</l>
          <r>caminar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cas</l>
          <r>casar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>celebr</l>
          <r>celebrar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>clav</l>
          <r>clavar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>compass</l>
          <r>compassar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>condens</l>
          <r>condensar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>connot</l>
          <r>connotar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>content</l>
          <r>acontentar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qüestion</l>
          <r>qüestionar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deix</l>
          <r>deixar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>acomiad</l>
          <r>acomiadar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>assembl</l>
          <r>assemblar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endoss</l>
          <r>endossar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>explot</l>
          <r>explotar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>funcion</l>
          <r>funcionar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>impact</l>
          <r>impactar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>integr</l>
          <r>integrar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>matricul</l>
          <r>matricular<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oblid</l>
          <r>oblidar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>paralitz</l>
          <r>paralitzar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>prov</l>
          <r>provar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>recoman</l>
          <r>recomanar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>represent</l>
          <r>representar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>senyalitz</l>
          <r>senyalitzar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fluctu</l>
          <r>fluctuar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>super</l>
          <r>superar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>utilitz</l>
          <r>utilitzar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>potenci</l>
          <r>potenciar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olor</l>
          <r>olorar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>buf</l>
          <r>bufar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dat</l>
          <r>datar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>domin</l>
          <r>dominar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enseny</l>
          <r>ensenyar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>explor</l>
          <r>explorar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atempt</l>
          <r>atemptar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deliber</l>
          <r>deliberar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deterior</l>
          <r>deteriorar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enzim</l>
          <r>enzimar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esquiv</l>
          <r>esquivar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fren</l>
          <r>frenar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_V1C"/>
      </e>
